District of Columbia statutes.
42-2005

Joint tenancies, tenancies in common, tenancies by the entirety.

Any condominium unit may be held and owned by more than 1 person as joint tenants, as tenants in common, as tenants by the entirety (in the case of husband and wife), or in any other real property tenancy relationship recognized under the laws of the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 451, Pub. L. 88-218, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1705.
1973 Ed., § 5-905.

Editor's Notes

Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.